Florida, session 2026, SB286.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (4) 12 of section 193.155, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 13 193.155âHomestead assessments.âHomestead property shall be 14 assessed at just value as of January 1, 1994. Property receiving 15 the homestead exemption after January 1, 1994, shall be assessed 16 at just value as of January 1 of the year in which the property 17 receives the exemption unless the provisions of subsection (8) 18 apply. 19 (4)(a)âExcept as provided in paragraph (b) and s. 193.624, 20 changes, additions, or improvements to homestead property shall 21 be assessed at just value as of the first January 1 after the 22 changes, additions, or improvements are substantially completed. 23 (b)âIf the total just value of changes, additions, or 24 improvements to a homestead property is less than $100,000, the 25 assessment of the added value must be calculated by multiplying: 26 1.âThe percentage obtained by dividing the propertyâs 27 assessed value as of January 1 immediately before the change, 28 addition, or improvement, by the propertyâs just value as of 29 that same date; and 30 2.âThe just value of the change, addition, or improvement. 31 (c)âParagraph (b) does not apply to changes, additions, or 32 improvements that replace all or a substantial portion of the 33 property or that increase the total square footage of the 34 property by more than 25 percent. 35 1.âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all or 36 a portion of homestead property, including ancillary 37 improvements, damaged or destroyed by misfortune or calamity 38 shall be assessed upon substantial completion as provided in 39 this paragraph. Such assessment must be calculated using the 40 homestead propertyâs assessed value as of the January 1 41 immediately before the date on which the damage or destruction 42 was sustained, subject to the assessment limitations in 43 subsections (1) and (2), when: 44 a.âThe square footage of the homestead property as changed 45 or improved does not exceed 130 percent of the square footage of 46 the homestead property before the damage or destruction; or 47 b.âThe total square footage of the homestead property as 48 changed or improved does not exceed 2,000 square feet. 49 2.âThe homestead propertyâs assessed value must be 50 increased by the just value of that portion of the changed or 51 improved homestead property which is in excess of 130 percent of 52 the square footage of the homestead property before the damage 53 or destruction or of that portion exceeding 2,000 square feet. 54 3.âHomestead property damaged or destroyed by misfortune or 55 calamity which, after being changed or improved, has a square 56 footage of less than 100 percent of the homestead propertyâs 57 total square footage before the damage or destruction shall be 58 assessed pursuant to subsection (5). 59 4.âChanges, additions, or improvements assessed pursuant to 60 this paragraph must be reassessed pursuant to subsection (1) in 61 subsequent years. This paragraph applies to changes, additions, 62 or improvements commenced within 5 years after the January 1 63 following the damage or destruction of the homestead. 64 (c)âChanges, additions, or improvements that replace all or 65 a portion of real property that was damaged or destroyed by 66 misfortune or calamity shall be assessed upon substantial 67 completion as if such damage or destruction had not occurred and 68 in accordance with paragraph (b) if the owner of such property: 69 1.âWas permanently residing on such property when the 70 damage or destruction occurred; 71 2.âWas not entitled to receive homestead exemption on such 72 property as of January 1 of that year; and 73 3.âApplies for and receives homestead exemption on such 74 property the following year. 75 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.